Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.070

Examination—Record.

With the exception of those applicants granted licensure through the provisions of RCW 18.71.090 or 18.71.095, applicants for licensure must successfully complete an examination administered by the commission to determine their professional qualifications. The commission shall prepare and give, or approve the preparation and giving of, an examination which shall cover those general subjects and topics, a knowledge of which is commonly and generally required of candidates for the degree of doctor of medicine conferred by approved colleges or schools of medicine in the United States. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commission has the sole responsibility for determining the proficiency of applicants under this chapter, and, in so doing, may waive any prerequisite to licensure not set forth in this chapter.

The commission may by rule establish the passing grade for the examination.

Examination results shall be part of the records of the commission and shall be permanently kept with the applicant's file.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 311; 1985 c 322 s 3; 1975 1st ex.s. c 171 s 10; 1961 c 284 s 8; 1919 c 134 s 4; 1909 c 192 s 6; RRS s 10009.]

NOTES:

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.